en: Turbot
fr: Turbot
hr: Iverak
ja: イシビラメ

en: Roasted turbot, Baked turbot
fr: Turbot rôti, Turbot cuit au four

en: Wild turbot
es: Rodaballo salvaje
fr: Turbot sauvage
hr: Divlji romb
it: Rombo selvaggio
pt: Tamboril selvagem

en: Farmed turbot
es: Rodaballo de piscifactoría
fr: Turbot d'élevage
hr: Uzgojeni romb
it: Rombo allevato
pt: Tamboril de aquicultura

en: Catfish, black bullhead, black bullhead catfish
fr: Poisson-chat

en: Brown bullhead
fr: Barbotte brune

en: Iridescent shark, pangasius
fr: Pangasius, Poisson-chat du Mékong, panga

en: Frozen iridescent shark, frozen pangasius
fr: Pangasius surgelé, panga surgelé

en: Cooked Pangasius fillets
fr: Filet de Panga cuit, Filet de Pangasius cuit, Filet de poisson-chat du Mékong cuit

en: Frozen Pangasius fillets, frozen Iridescent shark fillets
fr: Filets de Panga surgelés

en: Roasted European bass, Baked European bass
fr: Bar commun rôti, Bar commun cuit au four, Loup rôti, Loup cuit au four

en: Roasted mullet, Baked mullet
fr: Mulet rôti, Mulet cuit au four

en: Mullet
fr: Mulet
hr: Cipal
ja: ボラ科

en: Cods, Codfishes
de: Kabeljau
es: Bacalaos
fi: turskat
fr: Morues, Morue, Cabillauds, Cabillaud
hr: Bakalar
it: Merluzzo
ja: タラ, 鱈
nl: Kabeljauw
ro: Cod, Cozi
tr: Morina, Morina balığı

en: Cooked cods, Cooked cod
fr: Cabillauds cuits, Cabillaud cuit

en: Frozen cods, Frozen cod
fr: Cabillauds surgelés, Cabillaud surgelé

en: Smoked cod
fr: Morue fumée

en: Black seabream
fr: dorade grise, daurade grise, griset

en: Blackspot seabream
fr: dorade rose, daurade rose

en: Salema
fr: Saupe